Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.336

Availability of campgrounds to contract purchasers—Blanket encumbrances—Penalty for noncompliance.

(1) With respect to every campground located within the state which was not made available to purchasers of camping resort contracts prior to June 20, 1988, and with respect to any new blanket encumbrance placed against any campground in this state or any prior blanket encumbrance against any campground in this state with respect to which the underlying obligation is refinanced after June 20, 1988, the camping resort operator shall not represent any such campground to be available to purchasers of its camping resort contracts until one of the following events has occurred with regard to each such blanket encumbrance:

(a) The camping resort operator obtains and records as covenants to run with the land a nondisturbance agreement from each holder of the blanket encumbrance. The nondisturbance agreement shall be executed by the camping resort operator and by each holder of the blanket encumbrance and shall include the provisions set forth in RCW 19.105.300(18) and the following:

(i) The instrument may be enforced by individual purchasers of camping resort contracts. If the camping resort operator is not in default under its obligations to the holder of the blanket encumbrance, the agreement may be enforced by the camping resort operator.

(ii) The agreement shall be effective as between each purchaser and the holder of the blanket encumbrance despite any rejection or cancellation of the purchaser's contract during any bankruptcy proceedings of the camping resort operator.

(iii) The agreement shall be binding upon the successors in interest of both the camping resort operator and the holder of the blanket encumbrance.

(iv) A holder of the blanket encumbrance who obtains title or possession or who causes a change in title or possession in a campground by foreclosure or otherwise and who does not continue to operate the campground upon conditions no less favorable to members than existed prior to the change of title or possession shall either:

(A) Offer the title or possession to an association of members to operate the campground; or

(B) Obtain a commitment from another entity which obtains title or possession to undertake the responsibility of operating the campground.

(b) The camping resort operator posts a bond or irrevocable letter of credit with the director in a form satisfactory to the director in the amount of the aggregate principal indebtedness remaining due under the blanket encumbrance.

(c) The camping resort operator delivers an encumbrance trust agreement in a form satisfactory to the director, as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(d) The camping resort operator delivers other financial assurances reasonably acceptable to the director.

(2) With respect to any campground located within the state other than a campground described in subsection (1) of this section, the camping resort operator shall not represent the campground to be available to purchasers of camping resort contracts after June 20, 1988, until one of the following events has occurred with regard to each blanket encumbrance:

(a) The camping resort operator obtains and records a nondisturbance agreement to run with the land pursuant to subsection (1) of this section from each holder of the blanket encumbrance.

(b) The camping resort operator posts a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit with the director in a form satisfactory to the director in the amount of the aggregate principal indebtedness remaining due under the blanket encumbrance.

(c) The camping resort operator delivers to the director, in a form satisfactory to the director, an encumbrance trust agreement among the camping resort operator, a trustee (which can be either a corporate trustee licensed to act as a trustee under Washington law, licensed escrow agent, or a licensed attorney), and the director.

(d) The camping resort operator delivers evidence to the director that any financial institution that has made a hypothecation loan to the camping resort operator (the "hypothecation lender") shall have a lien on, or security interest in, the camping resort operator's interest in the campground, and the hypothecation lender shall have executed and recorded a nondisturbance agreement in the real estate records of the county in which the campground is located. Each person holding an interest in a blanket encumbrance superior to the interest held by the hypothecation lender shall have executed and recorded an instrument stating that such person shall give the hypothecation lender notice of, and at least thirty days to cure, any default under the blanket encumbrance before the person commences any foreclosure action affecting the campground. For the purposes of this subsection, a hypothecation loan to a camping resort operator is a loan or line of credit secured by the camping resort contracts receivable arising from the sale of camping resort contracts by the camping resort operator, which exceeds in the aggregate all outstanding indebtedness secured by blanket encumbrances superior to the interest held by the hypothecation lender.

(e) The camping resort operator delivers other financial assurances reasonably acceptable to the director.

(3) Any camping resort operator which does not comply at all times with subsection (1) or (2) of this section with regard to any blanket encumbrance in connection with any applicable campground is prohibited from offering any camping resort contracts for sale in Washington during the period of noncompliance.

[ 1988 c 159 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 159: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and, with the exception of section 7 of this act, shall take effect immediately [March 20, 1988]. Section 7 of this act shall take effect ninety days thereafter [June 20, 1988]." [ 1988 c 159 s 29.]